Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0820.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 659. (1) If a county, city, ward, township, village, metropolitan district, or school district is divided into 2 or more election precincts, the county, city, ward, township, or village election commissioners may, by resolution, consolidate the election precincts for a particular election that is not a general November election, primary election immediately before a general November election, or other statewide or federal election. In making the determination to consolidate election precincts for a particular election, the election commission shall take into consideration the number of choices the voter elector must make, the percentage of registered voters electors who voted at the last similar election in the jurisdiction, the distance between election precinct polling places, the access electors have to public transportation, and the intensity of the interest of the electors in the jurisdiction concerning the candidates and proposals to be voted upon. on. Consolidated precincts shall must not exceed 5,000 15,000 active registered electors. (2) A consolidation under this section shall must be made not less than 60 days before a primary, general, or special election. (3) Unless the polling places for the election precincts to be consolidated are located in the same building, when a county, city, ward, township, or village consolidates election precincts for a particular election under subsection (1), the election commissioners or other designated election officials shall do both of the following: (a) Provide notice to the registered electors of the affected election precincts of the consolidation of election precincts for the particular election and the location of the polling place for the election precinct or precincts for that election. Notice may be provided by mail or other method designed to provide actual notice to the registered electors. (b) Post a written notice at each election precinct polling place stating the location of the consolidated election precinct polling place. (4) If a county, city, ward, township, or village consolidates election precincts under this section, each affected election precinct shall must be treated as a whole unit and shall must not be divided during the consolidation.